New York, session 2025-2026, A8948.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (j) of section 19.09 of the mental hygiene law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph 4 to read as follows: 3 (4) Utilizing data that is available to the office, the commissioner 4 shall identify the counties in New York state where prescription 5 substance use disorder is most prevalent. Pharmacists licensed by the 6 state to dispense prescription drugs may be notified at the discretion 7 of the commissioner in collaboration with the department of health, 8 about the prevalence of substance use disorder in the county in which 9 such pharmacists are located and may distribute materials created pursu- 10 ant to this subdivision. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 12 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10508-02-6